pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.aff
SET ISO8859-1
LANG pt
WORDCHARS 0123456789$-'
BREAK 0

KEEPCASE &
NOSUGGEST !
FORBIDDENWORD ~
NEEDAFFIX *
CIRCUMFIX ^

KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjklç|zxcvbnm|qaw|wse|edr|rft|tgy|yhu|uji|iko|olpç|azs|sxd|dcf|fvg|gbh|hnj|jmk|áàâã|éèê|úíóùìòûîôõ

ICONV 1
ICONV ' ’


MAP 9
MAP aáäàâãå
MAP eéëèê
MAP iíïìîyýÿ
MAP oóöòôõ
MAP uúüùû
MAP (ch)x
MAP (qu)k
MAP (ss)ç
MAP sz

TRY sieroçcnaguhjtlmdíózvp-’

MAXNGRAMSUGS 5
MAXDIFF 7

REP 85
REP ^a           Á
REP ^a           Â
REP ^e           É
REP ^i           Í
REP ^concerteza$ com_certeza
REP ^concertesa$ com_certeza
REP ^derrepente$ de_repente
REP ^encima$     em_cima
REP ^atoa$       à_toa
REP ^Beijing$    Pequim
REP ^ben         bem-
REP ^es          his
REP ^de          de_
REP ^do          do_
REP âim          ãi
REP ^pre         pré-
REP ^pré-        pre
REP ^sócio-      socio
REP ^vídeo-      video
REP ^re-         re
REP o-h          o
REP ca           ça
REP co           ço
REP a            á
REP e            ê
REP e            é
REP i            í
REP ^c           s
REP ^s           c
REP ge           je
REP a$           o
REP as$          os
REP r            l
REP l            u
REP o            u
REP ss           c
REP c            ss
REP cç           x
REP alha         ália
REP cao$         ção
REP coes$        ções
REP çao$         são
REP çoes$        sões
REP ãos$         ões
REP ãos$         ães
REP ões$         ãos
REP ona$         ã
REP onas$        ãs
REP medi         medei
REP eram$        iveram
REP aberam$      ouberam
REP oram$        useram
REP abesse$      oubesse
REP osse$        usesse
REP sse$         esse
REP esse$        ivesse
REP eu$          eve
REP abeu$        oube
REP iu$          eio
REP ram$         eram
REP ste$         este
REP ão$          am
REP ao$          am
REP ao           ão
REP an$          ã
REP á$           ar
REP is$          ereu
REP nhem$        er
REP nhe          e
REP eram$        e
REP ^diz         diss
REP ^abrid       abert
REP ^cobrid      cobert
REP ^escrevid    escrit
REP ^ponhar$     pôr
REP ^ponhei$     pus
REP ^trazesse$   trouxesse
REP ^fazesse$    fizesse
REP ^hajar$      houver
REP ^teje$       esteja
REP -da-         _da_
REP -de-         _de_
REP -do-         _do_
REP -a-          _a_
REP -            _

PFX U Y 4
PFX U   0   auto    [^ohrs]
PFX U   0   auto-   [oh]
PFX U   0   autor   r
PFX U   0   autos   s

PFX É Y 1
PFX É   0   recém-/^        .

SFX é Y 20
SFX é   r    do/^É     ar
SFX é   r    da/^É     ar
SFX é   r    dos/^É    ar
SFX é   r    das/^É    ar
SFX é   er   ido/^É    er
SFX é   er   ida/^É    er
SFX é   er   idos/^É   er
SFX é   er   idas/^É   er
SFX é   ir   ído/^É    [^q][ua]ir #concluir
SFX é   ir   ída/^É    [^q][ua]ir #atrair
SFX é   ir   ídos/^É   [^q][ua]ir
SFX é   ir   ídas/^É   [^q][ua]ir
SFX é   ir   ido/^É       [^ua]ir #demitir
SFX é   ir   ida/^É       [^ua]ir
SFX é   ir   idos/^É      [^ua]ir
SFX é   ir   idas/^É      [^ua]ir
SFX é   ir   ido/^É          quir #extorquir
SFX é   ir   ida/^É          quir
SFX é   ir   idos/^É         quir
SFX é   ir   idas/^É         quir

PFX A Y 5
PFX A   0               anti            [^hirsCEHILPU]
PFX A   0               antir           r
PFX A   0               antis           s
PFX A   0               anti-           [hiCEHILPU]
PFX A   0               Anti-           [hiCEHILPU]

PFX S Y 2
PFX S   0               des             [^h]
PFX S   h               des             h

PFX I Y 5
PFX I   0               in              [^hbplmnr]
PFX I   h               in              h
PFX I   0               im              [bp]
PFX I   0               i               [lmn]
PFX I   0               ir              r

PFX Í Y 4
PFX Í   0   in/^   [^bplmnr]
PFX Í   0   im/^   [bp]
PFX Í   0   i/^    [lmn]
PFX Í   0   ir/^   r

SFX í Y 6
SFX í   ar   ável/^Í    ar
SFX í   er   ível/^Í    er
SFX í   ir   ível/^Í    ir
SFX í   ar   áveis/^Í   ar
SFX í   er   íveis/^Í   er
SFX í   ir   íveis/^Í   ir


PFX R Y 3
PFX R   0               re              [^sh]
PFX R   0               res             s
PFX R   h               re              h

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0               pré-            .

PFX O Y 2
PFX O   0               Pós-            .
PFX O   0               pós-            .

PFX u Y 2
PFX u   0               sub-            [bhr]
PFX u   0               sub             [^bhr]

PFX x Y 2
PFX x   0               Ex-             .
PFX x   0               ex-             .

PFX V Y 1
PFX V   0               vice-           .

PFX F Y 3
PFX F   0               ultra           .
PFX F   0               super           .
PFX F   0               hiper           .

PFX T Y 7
PFX T   0               hepta           .
PFX T   0               bi              .
PFX T   0               tris            s
PFX T   0               tri             [^s]
PFX T   0               tetra           .
PFX T   0               penta           .
PFX T   0               hexa            .

SFX p Y 15
SFX p   0               s               [^ã][^lsmrnzx]
SFX p   0               s               ãe
SFX p   ão              ões             ão
SFX p   l               is              [au]l
SFX p   ol              óis             ol
SFX p   el              éis             [^v]el
SFX p   el              éis             [^áéíóú]vel
SFX p   l               is              [áéíóú]vel
SFX p   l               s               il
SFX p   0               es              [^áéê]s
SFX p   ás              ases            ás
SFX p   és              eses            és
SFX p   ês              eses            ês
SFX p   m               ns              m
SFX p   0               es              [rnzx]

SFX a Y 4
SFX a   0               s               ão
SFX a   il              eis             il
SFX a   os              as              entos
SFX a   0               s               [^aeiouls]

SFX e Y 2
SFX e   0               es              l
SFX e   o               es              ão

SFX f Y 12
SFX f   o               a               [^ã]o
SFX f   o               as              [^ã]o
SFX f   0               a               [^aeiouscn]
SFX f   0               as              [^aeiouscn]
SFX f   0               a               [^ê]s
SFX f   0               as              [^ê]s
SFX f   ês              esa             ês
SFX f   ês              esas            ês
SFX f   ão              ona             ão
SFX f   ão              onas            ão
SFX f   e               a               e
SFX f   e               as              e

SFX j Y 8
SFX j o ão   o
SFX j o ões  o
SFX j a ão   a
SFX j a ões  a
SFX j e ão   e
SFX j e ões  e
SFX j r dão  [ai]r
SFX j r dões [ai]r

SFX k Y 8
SFX k o ona   o
SFX k o onas  o
SFX k a ona   a
SFX k a onas  a
SFX k e ona   e
SFX k e onas  e
SFX k r dona  [ai]r
SFX k r donas [ai]r


SFX b Y 4
SFX b   o               0               ão
SFX b   o               s               ão
SFX b   0               ssa             e
SFX b   0               ssas            e

SFX g Y 8
SFX g   e   agem    e
SFX g   e   agens   e
SFX g   o   agem    o
SFX g   o   agens   o
SFX g   0   gem     a
SFX g   0   gens    a
SFX g   r   gem     ar
SFX g   r   gens    ar

SFX m Y 5
SFX m   o               amente          o
SFX m   0               amente          u
SFX m   0               mente           [^v][^q][^uo]
SFX m   ável            avelmente       ável
SFX m   ível            ivelmente       ível
