pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.dic
adiar/XYPLMví
ajudar/XYPLS
ajustar/XYPLDMNWnvERS
ajuste/pWEOU
aldeão/bp
alugar/XYPLDMvué
analisar/XYPLDnvERU
analítico/fpHEU
anão/pb
ancião/baep
anêmico/fp
anfitrião/pb
apartamento/plWx
aposentado/fpx
apreciar/XYPLDMcvRSUí
apropriatório/fpS
aquisição/pERO
arbitrar/XYPLDMgí
armar/XYPLMcnRSé
arquivilão/bp
asa/phk
asmático/fpA
assexuado/fpm
assumir/XYPLBNRSé
auferir/ZYPLví
autor/fpx
avaliar/XYPLDMcEORUu
aval/pet
avulso/fpm
bafo/plj
barco/fplhjk
Beatles/O
behaviorista/p
beijo/pljF
beirão/pb
bicho/fplhjkG
biscoito/plg
blog/a
boleiro/fpx
bolha/phjkw
branquelo/fplh
brigadeiro/pj
brilhar/XYLPR
burro/fplhjkmsG
cacique/pitV
cadastro/pU
câmera/pF
campeão/pbxVFT
campeonato/plTV
canábico/fp
câncer/pAO
canoa/pg
cansar/XYPLBNWjkS
canudo/plj
cão/e
capelão/ex
capitão/bex
capturar/XYPLDRéí
carnavalesco/fpEx
casamento/pxEORS
casar/XYPLDNWvRSé
catalão/eb
causal/pmd
cefálico/fpO
censitário/fp
centenário/fpT
center/a
chanceler/pxV
charlatão/fbpeA
chato/fplhjksGF
chegar/XYPLDMnNWé
chocolate/pljW
cisão/pu
cístico/fp
civilmente/I
clímax/A
CLT/x
coito/pO
comissário/fpVux
compensar/XYPLDBcnvFRSí
comportar/XYPLMNWví
comprimir/XYPLvSí
computador/fplE
conceder/XYPLnvU
conceituar/XYPLNWcRS
concessão/pu
concessível/pI
concidadão/ab
confessor/pf
confiante/pmFU
consciencioso/fpdm
considerar/XYPLBcvRSUé
construção/pRSU
construtivo/fpmitORS
cônsul-geral/xV
cônsul/xVe
consumo/pitAO
contagiabilidade/pI
contar/XYPLNWcvgRSí
contente/pslhzFS
controverter/XYPLví
coordenador/fpVxu
corda/phjkF
corretor/fplUx
corrimão/pa
cotovelo/plj
cozer/XYPLDMER
crack/AO
cracker/a
cultura/phituAI
cúspide/pT
datilografar/XYPLR
decacampeão/pb
decente/pmI
delgado/fpm
demitir/XYPLé
denominar/XYPLDcUé
descobrir/YPLDMRUí
despistar/XYPLMg
digerir/ZYPLvEUí
dimensional/pmdT
dimensionar/XYPLDMvFRu
direita/pitFAx
diretor/fplVux
dirigente/xp
discriminativo/Ifp
discurso/ptlW
distribucionista/pR
doido/fplhjkmG
doutoramento/pO
drogar/XYPLé
DST/a
eclampsia/pE
edificativo/S
editorial/pmt
eludir/XYPLí
empossar/XYPLRSé
empregar/XYPLNWRSué
encaixar/XYPLMNWnRS
engano/pSU
engavetar/XYPLDMS
engraçado/fplhjks
entupo/SL
equilibrar/XYPLScDnRBN
escova/phjkEO
escrivão/bex
escroque/p
especializar/XYPLNWcnué
específico/pfHI
especulativo/fpm
espumante/pA
estiar/Lg
estimar/XYPLDcvuRí
evidencial/pm
exposição/pU
falsificar/XYPLDcví
fama/phEO
famoso/fplhjkdmsF
Febem/x
fechar/XYPLDBMNWjSé
festejo/pE
fétido/fp
filho/fplhjk
fisiológico/fpHA
flexível/pdmIR
força/phF
forçoso/fpdm
formatar/XYPLDcERé
fóton/a
frescura/phg
fundar/XYPLDMcvRné
fusca/phj
geminiano/pf
ginasiano/fpu
governadoria/pV
grande/plhjkms
guardião/bpe
guerra/phAEO
guitarrista/px
harmonioso/fpSm
hipnótico/fpHU
história/pE
honesto/fplhjkdmsS
HQ/a
ignorante/pjkitm
importante/psSF
incomparável/mdp
indefeso/fp
inflacionário/fpAFS
inflamatório/fpAO
infligir/XYPLU
iniciar/XYPLDMNcnRé
insanável/pmd
insolvência/pE
intermediário/fp
inversão/pS
investi/PLRS
irmão/ab
jardinar/XYLg
legalizar/XYPLDcIé
LG/a
licença/phu
limitar/XYPLDBNWcnvIU
loja/pthjk
luxuoso/fpdmsF
madeireiro/fpx
máfia/pA
mal/e
mandrião/bp
maquiagem/phEOU
mastologia/pt
mavioso/fpm
mecanístico/fp
mendigo/fplhjkgA
menino/fplhjkGx
metálico/fpuT
metralhadora/pu
ministro/fplhjkFVx
modernizar/XYPLDcné
moderno/fplhjkdmitswGFEO
monarquia/pitO
moralizar/XYPLcDnS
morrer/XYLí
motherfucker/a!
motor/fplEU
municiar/XYPLDR
muquirana/pgG
nacional/pdimtuAF
negociador/fpx
novo/fpmdlhsjkF
obstruirmos/SL
ocupar/XYPLDcRSué
oficioso/fpdmI
órfão/ab
organoléptico/fp
paleta/p
pão/e
paralelo/fpmiA
passivo/fplhjkdims
password/a
paulista/phjkA
pavimentar/XYPLcRé
peptídeo/pT
percentual/pm
perícia/pEIO
piriguete/phx
pistola/phjkgs
plano/fpmlhT
plausível/pdI
poluir/KPLDNnvASí
preencher/XYPLDMEUí
prefeitura/pu
presidente/pTx
prevenis/SL
primeira-dama/xV
priorizar/XYPLcnR
proceder/XYPLnI
processar/XYPLMDnvEORé
procuradora-geral/Vux
produtor/fpxU
profissional/pmisuxAF
provedor/fpV
provento/px
publicar/XYPLDcvERSUéí
publisher/a
punhado/pl
qualificar/XYPLDNWcnvEFRSuí
quarenta/hjk
quimioterapia/pO
rabeca/pj
razoável/pdmI
realístico/fpHI
reclamar/XYPLDcnví
refluxo/pA
refrão/ae
regulatório/fpU
reitor/fpuVx
resfriar/XYPLDMNWcu
resignar/XYPLBcnvIí
ressequir/CPLé
rodar/XYPLNWng
sacristão/abex
sal/pEO
são/abPL
secretária-executiva/x
secretário/fpxV
secundário/pfH
sedan/a
seleção/pxE
sensatez/pI
sogro/fplhjkx
solução/p
Steven/a
submergir/XYPLvní
superdetalhado/fpm
tapar/XYPLDMgS
teatro/pljt
temperar/XYPLDMBWnvIRS
testar/XYPLMDnvRéí
teste/pgEU
tonal/pdT
trágico/fpH
trainer/a
transexual/pdx
treinar/XYPLMNWvERSí
trollar/XYPLDcg
tubarão/pA
turbo/pT
usucapir/XYPLví
vacina/phAO
valor/plASUu
vão/abL
varanda/phjk
vertebrado/fpI
videoaula/p
viralizar/XYPLcvRé
vistas/LPS
woofer/au
